apertium-hin.hin.dix
    <pardef n="स/ा__adj">
      <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
   
    <pardef n="कई/अ__adj">
      <e><p><l>अ</l><r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>अ</l><r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>अ</l><r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>अ</l><r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r>अ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->      
  
    <pardef n="क/र__vblex_tv">
      <e>       <p><l>रूँगा</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रेंगे</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रूँगी</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रेंगी</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रेगा</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रेगा</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रेगी</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रेंगी</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रेगा</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रेंगे</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रेगी</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रेंगी</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रनेवाला</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रनेवाले</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रनेवाली</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रनेवाली</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रना</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रनी</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>रने</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रूँ</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रें</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रो</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रो</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>र</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रें</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>र</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रो</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रे</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रता</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रते</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रती</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रती</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>रके</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िया</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">       <p><l>िये</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>िए</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ी</l><r>र<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<e lm="सक्रिय कर"><i>सक्रिय<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="विस्तृत कर"><i>विस्तृत<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="अभिलाषा कर"><i>अभिलाषा<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="शिकार कर"><i>शिकार<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बरदाश्त कर"><i>बरदाश्त<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ब्लैकमेल कर"><i>ब्लैकमेल<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="आउट कर"><i>आउट<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="प्रसारित कर"><i>प्रसारित<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="हिसाब कर"><i>हिसाब<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="स्वीकार कर"><i>स्वीकार<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="कीर्तिगान कर"><i>कीर्तिगान<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="आकर्षित कर"><i>आकर्षित<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="शुद्ध कर"><i>शुद्ध<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="खाली कर"><i>खाली<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="मसखरी कर"><i>मसखरी<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पार कर"><i>पार<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="कंप्यूटरीकरण कर"><i>कंप्यूटरीकरण<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बर्बाद कर"><i>बर्बाद<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="छोटा कर"><i>छोटा<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="निश्चित कर"><i>निश्चित<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="निर्दिष्ट कर"><i>निर्दिष्ट<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="तर्क-वितर्क कर"><i>तर्क-वितर्क<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="प्राप्त कर"><i>प्राप्त<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पृष्ठांकन कर"><i>पृष्ठांकन<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="खुश कर"><i>खुश<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पालन-पोषण कर"><i>पालन-पोषण<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="कार्यरत्त कर"><i>कार्यरत्त<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="परिहास कर"><i>परिहास<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पूरा कर"><i>पूरा<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="आशा कर"><i>आशा<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="अतिक्रमण कर"><i>अतिक्रमण<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="प्रकाशित कर"><i>प्रकाशित<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ब्ंअद कर"><i>ब्ंअद<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="याद कर"><i>याद<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पार कर"><i>पार<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="रवाना कर"><i>रवाना<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="छेद कर"><i>छेद<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="नियुक्त कर"><i>नियुक्त<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="तैयार कर"><i>तैयार<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="वर्धन कर"><i>वर्धन<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पुनर्प्रसारण कर"><i>पुनर्प्रसारण<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="चर्चा कर"><i>चर्चा<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="मुक्त कर"><i>मुक्त<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ज़ब्त कर"><i>ज़ब्त<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="बराबर कर"><i>बराबर<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="प्रकट कर"><i>प्रकट<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="स्थगित कर"><i>स्थगित<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="व्यापार कर"><i>व्यापार<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="मुआइना कर"><i>मुआइना<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पाप कर"><i>पाप<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="प्रगति कर"><i>प्रगति<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="पाप कर"><i>पाप<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="एकत्र कर"><i>एकत्र<b/>क</i><par n="क/र__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="थोड़ा"><i>थोड़</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="काना"><i>कान</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नीला"><i>नील</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उतना"><i>उतन</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="वैसा"><i>वैस</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="बड़ा"><i>बड़</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
 	<e lm="सांवला"><i>सांवल</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="गूँगा"><i>गूँग</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मतवाला"><i>मतवाल</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लंगडा"><i>लंगड</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="भौचक्का"><i>भौचक्क</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बनैला"><i>बनैल</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="आइंदा"><i>आइंद</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="धीरा"><i>धीर</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बकाया"><i>बकाय</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मुंडा"><i>मुंड</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="हराभरा"><i>हराभर</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चुनिंदा"><i>चुनिंद</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मरा"><i>मर</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जनाना"><i>जनान</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खोखला"><i>खोखल</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खारा"><i>खार</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लजीला"><i>लजील</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="घुँघराला"><i>घुँघराल</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जानलेवा"><i>जानलेव</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दुतरफा"><i>दुतरफ</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गुनगुना"><i>गुनगुन</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फुरतीला"><i>फुरतील</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मझोला"><i>मझोल</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गुदगुदा"><i>गुदगुद</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अकेला"><i>अकेल</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="थोथा"><i>थोथ</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="झूठा"><i>झूठ</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="छूछा"><i>छूछ</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लंबा"><i>लंब</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="थका"><i>थक</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दाहिना"><i>दाहिन</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="झबरा"><i>झबर</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चिपचिपा"><i>चिपचिप</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मौजूदा"><i>मौजूद</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="शौकिया"><i>शौकिय</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनमना"><i>अनमन</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="काला"><i>काल</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="रंगबिरंगा"><i>रंगबिरंग</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खस्ता"><i>खस्त</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अटपटा"><i>अटपट</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बावला"><i>बावल</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="एकरंगा"><i>एकरंग</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गुमशुदा"><i>गुमशुद</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बेचारा"><i>बेचार</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जीता"><i>जीत</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पाँचवा"><i>पाँचव</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सतरंगा"><i>सतरंग</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पैना"><i>पैन</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
